Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 5

Temporary Family Healthcare Structures

13-7-501. Part definitions.

For purposes of this part:

“Caregiver” means an adult who provides care for a mentally or physically impaired person within this state, and who is related by blood, marriage, or adoption to, or shall be the legally appointed guardian of, the mentally or physically impaired person for whom the adult is caring;

“Mentally or physically impaired person” means a person who is a resident of this state and who requires assistance with two (2) or more activities of daily living, as certified in a writing provided by a physician licensed under title 63, chapter 6 or 9; and

“Temporary family healthcare structure” means a transportable healthcare environment that is specifically designed with environmental controls, biometric and other remote monitoring technology, sensors, and communication systems to support extended home-based medical care, rehabilitation, and the provision of home- and community-based support and assistance for an older adult or person with a disability on the property where family members or unpaid caregivers who participate in the person's care reside. A temporary family healthcare structure:

Is primarily assembled at a location other than its site of installation;

Is limited to one (1) occupant who shall be the older adult or person with a disability who requires extended home-based medical care, rehabilitation, or the provision of home and community-based support and assistance;

Meets the accessibility guidelines of the federal department of housing and urban development and the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. § 12131 et seq.);

Has no more than five hundred gross square feet (500 gross sq. ft.); and

Complies with applicable provisions of title 68, chapter 120, part 1, and codes adopted by a county pursuant to title 5. Placing the temporary family healthcare structure on a permanent foundation shall not be required or permitted.

Acts 2016, ch. 992, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 992, § 1 enacted a new part 5 with only one section, § 13-7-501, but that section has been reorganized and divided into multiple sections, §§ 13-7-501 – 13-7-505, by authority of the Code Commission.

13-7-502. Temporary family healthcare structure as permitted accessory use — Permit.

For all purposes under this chapter, zoning ordinances may consider as a permitted accessory use in any single-family residential zoning district on lots zoned for single-family detached dwellings, any temporary family healthcare structures that are:

For use by a caregiver in providing care for a mentally or physically impaired person; and

On property owned or occupied by the caregiver as their residence.

Temporary family healthcare structures shall comply with any local requirements for accessory dwelling structures of this type. Temporary family healthcare structures shall comply with all setback requirements that apply to the primary structure and with any maximum floor area ratio limitations that may apply to the primary structure. Only one (1) temporary family healthcare structure shall be allowed on a lot or parcel of land.

Any person proposing to install a temporary family healthcare structure shall first obtain a permit from the local governing body, for which the local government may charge a fee of up to one hundred dollars ($100). The local government may not withhold such permit if the applicant provides sufficient proof of compliance with this section. The local government may require that the applicant provide evidence of compliance with this section on an annual basis as long as the temporary family healthcare structure remains on the property. This evidence may involve the inspection by the locality of the temporary family healthcare structure at reasonable times convenient to the caregiver, not limited to any annual compliance confirmation.

Acts 2016, ch. 992, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 992, § 1 enacted a new part 5 with only one section, § 13-7-501, but that section has been reorganized and divided into multiple sections, §§ 13-7-501 – 13-7-505, by authority of the Code Commission.

13-7-503. Compliance with local codes and ordinances and applicable requirements of department of health.

Any temporary family healthcare structure installed pursuant to this part shall comply with any local codes and ordinances to connect to any water, sewer, and electric utilities that are serving the primary residence on the property and shall comply with all applicable requirements of the department of health.

Acts 2016, ch. 992, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 992, § 1 enacted a new part 5 with only one section, § 13-7-501, but that section has been reorganized and divided into multiple sections, §§ 13-7-501 – 13-7-505, by authority of the Code Commission.

13-7-504. Signage, advertisement, or other promotion of existence of structure not permitted.

No signage advertising or otherwise promoting the existence of the structure shall be permitted either on the exterior of the temporary family healthcare structure or elsewhere on the property.

Acts 2016, ch. 992, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 992, § 1 enacted a new part 5 with only one section, § 13-7-501, but that section has been reorganized and divided into multiple sections, §§ 13-7-501 – 13-7-505, by authority of the Code Commission.

13-7-505. Removal of structure — Revocation of permit.

Any temporary family healthcare structure installed pursuant to this section shall be removed by the property owner within thirty (30) days from which the mentally or physically impaired person is no longer receiving or is no longer in need of the assistance provided for in this section. The local government may fine the property owner up to fifty dollars ($50.00) per day for a violation of this section, with each day constituting a separate offense.

The local governing body, or planning commission on its behalf, may revoke the permit granted pursuant to § 13-7-502(b) if the permit holder violates this section. Additionally, the local governing body may seek injunctive relief or other appropriate actions or proceedings in the circuit court of that locality to ensure compliance with this section. The local codes department or building inspector is vested with all necessary authority on behalf of the governing body of the locality to ensure compliance with this section.

Acts 2016, ch. 992, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 992, § 1 enacted a new part 5 with only one section, § 13-7-501, but that section has been reorganized and divided into multiple sections, §§ 13-7-501 – 13-7-505, by authority of the Code Commission.